apertium-id-ms.id.metadix
    <pardef n="kebakaran/__vblex">
    <e>
      <p>
        <l></l>
        <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="subst"/><s n="ke-an"/><s n="sg"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>nya</l>
        <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="subst"/><s n="ke-an"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nya"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>-<prm/></l>
        <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="subst"/><s n="ke-an"/><s n="pl"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>-<prm/>nya</l>
        <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="subst"/><s n="ke-an"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nya"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="keabadian/__adj">
    <e>
      <p>
        <l></l>
        <r><s n="adj"/><s n="subst"/><s n="ke-an"/><s n="sg"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>nya</l>
        <r><s n="adj"/><s n="subst"/><s n="ke-an"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nya"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>-<prm/></l>
        <r><s n="adj"/><s n="subst"/><s n="ke-an"/><s n="pl"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>-<prm/>nya</l>
        <r><s n="adj"/><s n="subst"/><s n="ke-an"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nya"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="keesokan/__adv">
    <e>
      <p>
        <l></l>
        <r><s n="adv"/><s n="subst"/><s n="ke-an"/><s n="sg"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>nya</l>
        <r><s n="adv"/><s n="subst"/><s n="ke-an"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nya"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>-<prm/></l>
        <r><s n="adv"/><s n="subst"/><s n="ke-an"/><s n="pl"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>-<prm/>nya</l>
        <r><s n="adv"/><s n="subst"/><s n="ke-an"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nya"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="keseluruhan/__det">
    <e>
      <p>
        <l></l>
        <r><s n="det"/><s n="subst"/><s n="ke-an"/><s n="sg"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>nya</l>
        <r><s n="det"/><s n="subst"/><s n="ke-an"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nya"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>-<prm/></l>
        <r><s n="det"/><s n="subst"/><s n="ke-an"/><s n="pl"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>-<prm/>nya</l>
        <r><s n="det"/><s n="subst"/><s n="ke-an"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nya"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    </pardef>
    
    <!-- variations -->
    <pardef n="keberadaan/__vblex">
    <e>
      <p>
        <l></l>
        <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="subst"/><s n="ke-an"/><s n="ber"/><s n="sg"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>nya</l>
        <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="subst"/><s n="ke-an"/><s n="ber"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nya"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>-<prm/></l>
        <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="subst"/><s n="ke-an"/><s n="ber"/><s n="pl"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>-<prm/>nya</l>
        <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="subst"/><s n="ke-an"/><s n="ber"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nya"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="kependiaman/__vblex">
    <e>
      <p>
        <l></l>
        <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="subst"/><s n="ke-an"/><s n="peN"/><s n="sg"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>nya</l>
        <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="subst"/><s n="ke-an"/><s n="peN"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nya"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>-<prm/></l>
        <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="subst"/><s n="ke-an"/><s n="peN"/><s n="pl"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>-<prm/>nya</l>
        <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="subst"/><s n="ke-an"/><s n="peN"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nya"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="ketertinggalan/__vblex">
    <e>
      <p>
        <l></l>
        <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="subst"/><s n="ke-an"/><s n="ter"/><s n="sg"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>nya</l>
        <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="subst"/><s n="ke-an"/><s n="ter"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nya"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>-<prm/></l>
        <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="subst"/><s n="ke-an"/><s n="ter"/><s n="pl"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>-<prm/>nya</l>
        <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="subst"/><s n="ke-an"/><s n="ter"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nya"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="keseimbangan/__adj">
    <e>
      <p>
        <l></l>
        <r><s n="adj"/><s n="subst"/><s n="ke-an"/><s n="se"/><s n="sg"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>nya</l>
        <r><s n="adj"/><s n="subst"/><s n="ke-an"/><s n="se"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nya"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>-<prm/></l>
        <r><s n="adj"/><s n="subst"/><s n="ke-an"/><s n="se"/><s n="pl"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>-<prm/>nya</l>
        <r><s n="adj"/><s n="subst"/><s n="ke-an"/><s n="se"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nya"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="keterlambatan/__adj">
    <e>
      <p>
        <l></l>
        <r><s n="adj"/><s n="subst"/><s n="ke-an"/><s n="ter"/><s n="sg"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>nya</l>
        <r><s n="adj"/><s n="subst"/><s n="ke-an"/><s n="ter"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nya"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>-<prm/></l>
        <r><s n="adj"/><s n="subst"/><s n="ke-an"/><s n="ter"/><s n="pl"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>-<prm/>nya</l>
        <r><s n="adj"/><s n="subst"/><s n="ke-an"/><s n="ter"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nya"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="keberjayaan/__adj">
    <e>
      <p>
        <l></l>
        <r><s n="adj"/><s n="subst"/><s n="ke-an"/><s n="ber"/><s n="sg"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>nya</l>
        <r><s n="adj"/><s n="subst"/><s n="ke-an"/><s n="ber"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nya"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>-<prm/></l>
        <r><s n="adj"/><s n="subst"/><s n="ke-an"/><s n="ber"/><s n="pl"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>-<prm/>nya</l>
        <r><s n="adj"/><s n="subst"/><s n="ke-an"/><s n="ber"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nya"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="kepemudaan/__adj">
    <e>
      <p>
        <l></l>
        <r><s n="adj"/><s n="subst"/><s n="ke-an"/><s n="peN"/><s n="sg"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>nya</l>
        <r><s n="adj"/><s n="subst"/><s n="ke-an"/><s n="peN"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nya"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>-<prm/></l>
        <r><s n="adj"/><s n="subst"/><s n="ke-an"/><s n="peN"/><s n="pl"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>-<prm/>nya</l>
        <r><s n="adj"/><s n="subst"/><s n="ke-an"/><s n="peN"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nya"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    </pardef>

    <!-- peN-an -->
    <pardef n="pendaftaran/__n">
    <e>
      <p>
        <l></l>
        <r><s n="n"/><s n="peN-an"/><s n="sg"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>nya</l>
        <r><s n="n"/><s n="peN-an"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nya"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>-<prm/></l>
        <r><s n="n"/><s n="peN-an"/><s n="pl"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>-<prm/>nya</l>
        <r><s n="n"/><s n="peN-an"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nya"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="penarikan/__vblex">
    <e>
      <p>
        <l></l>
        <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="subst"/><s n="peN-an"/><s n="sg"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>nya</l>
        <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="subst"/><s n="peN-an"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nya"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>-<prm/></l>
        <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="subst"/><s n="peN-an"/><s n="pl"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>-<prm/>nya</l>
        <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="subst"/><s n="peN-an"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nya"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    </pardef>

    <e lm="celaka"><p><l>kecelakaan</l><r>celaka</r></p><par n="kebakaran/__vblex" prm="kecelakaan"/></e>
    <e lm="hilang"><p><l>kehilangan</l><r>hilang</r></p><par n="kebakaran/__vblex" prm="kehilangan"/></e>
    <e lm="muncul"><p><l>kemunculan</l><r>muncul</r></p><par n="kebakaran/__vblex" prm="kemunculan"/></e>
    <e lm="pulang"><p><l>kepulangan</l><r>pulang</r></p><par n="kebakaran/__vblex" prm="kepulangan"/></e>
    <e lm="sembuh"><p><l>kesembuhan</l><r>sembuh</r></p><par n="kebakaran/__vblex" prm="kesembuhan"/></e>
    <e lm="tewas"><p><l>ketewasan</l><r>tewas</r></p><par n="kebakaran/__vblex" prm="ketewasan"/></e>
    <e lm="brutal"><p><l>kebrutalan</l><r>brutal</r></p><par n="keabadian/__adj" prm="kebrutalan"/></e>
    <e lm="galak"><p><l>kegalakan</l><r>galak</r></p><par n="keabadian/__adj" prm="kegalakan"/></e>
    <e lm="jeli"><p><l>kejelian</l><r>jeli</r></p><par n="keabadian/__adj" prm="kejelian"/></e>
    <e lm="lain"><p><l>kelainan</l><r>lain</r></p><par n="keabadian/__adj" prm="kelainan"/></e>
    <e lm="papa"><p><l>kepapaan</l><r>papa</r></p><par n="keabadian/__adj" prm="kepapaan"/></e>
    <e lm="sosial"><p><l>kesosialan</l><r>sosial</r></p><par n="keabadian/__adj" prm="kesosialan"/></e>
    <e lm="ada"><p><l>keberadaan</l><r>ada</r></p><par n="keberadaan/__vblex" prm="keberadaan"/></e>
    <e lm="diam"><p><l>kependiaman</l><r>diam</r></p><par n="kependiaman/__vblex" prm="kependiaman"/></e>
    <e lm="juang"><p><l>kepejuangan</l><r>juang</r></p><par n="kependiaman/__vblex" prm="kepejuangan"/></e>
    <e lm="tinggal"><p><l>ketertinggalan</l><r>tinggal</r></p><par n="ketertinggalan/__vblex" prm="ketertinggalan"/></e>
    <e lm="tunduk"><p><l>ketertundukan</l><r>tunduk</r></p><par n="ketertinggalan/__vblex" prm="ketertundukan"/></e>
    <e lm="andal"><p><l>keterandalan</l><r>andal</r></p><par n="keterlambatan/__adj" prm="keterandalan"/></e>
    <e lm="kejut"><p><l>keterkejutan</l><r>kejut</r></p><par n="keterlambatan/__adj" prm="keterkejutan"/></e>
    <e lm="lambat"><p><l>keterlambatan</l><r>lambat</r></p><par n="keterlambatan/__adj" prm="keterlambatan"/></e>
    <e lm="padu"><p><l>keterpaduan</l><r>padu</r></p><par n="keterlambatan/__adj" prm="keterpaduan"/></e>
    <e lm="imbang"><p><l>keseimbangan</l><r>imbang</r></p><par n="keseimbangan/__adj" prm="keseimbangan"/></e>
    <e lm="utuh"><p><l>keseutuhan</l><r>utuh</r></p><par n="keseimbangan/__adj" prm="keseutuhan"/></e>
    <e lm="jaya"><p><l>keberjayaan</l><r>jaya</r></p><par n="keberjayaan/__adj" prm="keberjayaan"/></e>
    <e lm="sama"><p><l>kebersamaan</l><r>sama</r></p><par n="keberjayaan/__adj" prm="kebersamaan"/></e>
    <e lm="kecut"><p><l>kepengecutan</l><r>kecut</r></p><par n="kepemudaan/__adj" prm="kepengecutan"/></e>
    <e lm="muda"><p><l>kepemudaan</l><r>muda</r></p><par n="kepemudaan/__adj" prm="kepemudaan"/></e>
    <e lm="esok"><p><l>keesokan</l><r>esok</r></p><par n="keesokan/__adv" prm="keesokan"/></e>
    <e lm="seluruh"><p><l>keseluruhan</l><r>seluruh</r></p><par n="keseluruhan/__det" prm="keseluruhan"/></e>
    <e lm="cat"><p><l>pengecatan</l><r>cat</r></p><par n="pendaftaran/__n" prm="pengecatan"/></e>
    <e lm="granat"><p><l>penggranatan</l><r>granat</r></p><par n="pendaftaran/__n" prm="penggranatan"/></e>
    <e lm="kisah"><p><l>pengisahan</l><r>kisah</r></p><par n="pendaftaran/__n" prm="pengisahan"/></e>
    <e lm="program"><p><l>pemrograman</l><r>program</r></p><par n="pendaftaran/__n" prm="pemrograman"/></e>
    <e lm="suara"><p><l>penyuaraan</l><r>suara</r></p><par n="pendaftaran/__n" prm="penyuaraan"/></e>
    <e lm="bekuk"><p><l>pembekukan</l><r>bekuk</r></p><par n="penarikan/__vblex" prm="pembekukan"/></e>
    <e lm="buang"><p><l>pembuangan</l><r>buang</r></p><par n="penarikan/__vblex" prm="pembuangan"/></e>
    <e lm="dub"><p><l>pengeduban</l><r>dub</r></p><par n="penarikan/__vblex" prm="pengeduban"/></e>
    <e lm="hamil"><p><l>penghamilan</l><r>hamil</r></p><par n="penarikan/__vblex" prm="penghamilan"/></e>
    <e lm="jual"><p><l>penjualan</l><r>jual</r></p><par n="penarikan/__vblex" prm="penjualan"/></e>
